Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB594.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 336 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Information related to unlawful acts in the workplace" means information
pertaining to harassment, discrimination, and any other conduct the
employee has reasonable cause to believe is unlawful;
(b) "Nondisparagement agreement" means a provision that restricts statements
one (1) party may make against another party that may be construed as
negative or that may injure the reputation of another party; and
(c) "Release of a claim or right" means a statement that the employee does not
possess any claim or injury against the employer or other covered entity,
including a right to file and pursue a civil claim or administrative action.
(2) An employer shall not, as a condition of employment or continued employment,
or in exchange for a raise, bonus, or other employment benefit:
(a) Require an employee to sign a release of a claim or right;
(b) Require an employee to sign a nondisparagement agreement or other
document that has the effect of denying the employee the right to disclose
information related to unlawful acts in the workplace; or
(c) Include in any agreement related to the employee's separation from
employment provisions that prohibit the disclosure of information related to
unlawful acts in the workplace.
(3) This section shall not:
(a) Prohibit the entry or enforcement of a provision of a settlement agreement
that precludes the disclosure of the amount paid in settlement of a claim;
(b) Apply to a voluntary negotiated settlement agreement to resolve an
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1751
underlying claim that has been filed by an employee in court, before an
administrative agency, in an alternative dispute resolution forum, or
through an employer's internal complaint process;
(c) Prohibit an employer from protecting the employer's trade secrets or
proprietary or confidential information that does not involve unlawful acts
in the workplace; or
(d) Be construed to affect any civil action for defamation, libel, slander, or any
similar cause of action.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 372 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a settlement agreement entered into
after the effective date of this Act shall not contain a provision that prevents the
disclosure of factual information related to a civil or administrative action that
involves an act of:
(a) Sexual assault or sexual harassment;
(b) Workplace harassment or discrimination based on sex, or the failure to
prevent an act of workplace harassment or discrimination based on sex; or
(c) Harassment or discrimination based on sex, or an act of retaliation against
a person for reporting harassment or discrimination based on sex, by the
owner of a housing accommodation.
(2) This section shall not:
(a) Prohibit the entry or enforcement of a provision of a settlement agreement
that precludes the disclosure of the amount paid in settlement of a claim; or
(b) Apply to a voluntary negotiated settlement agreement to resolve an
underlying claim that has been filed in court, before an administrative
agency, in an alternative dispute resolution forum, or through an
employer's internal complaint process.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:28 PM Jacketed